Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201883-123
Department of Correctional Services; license plates; materials; Department of Motor Vehicles; duties.

(1) Out of the fund appropriated by the Legislature, the Department of Correctional Services shall purchase the materials for and manufacture the license plates each year for the various counties and the Department of Motor Vehicles. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall furnish to the Department of Correctional Services the information concerning license plates through a secure process and system, together with the number of plates to be manufactured for each county and the Department of Motor Vehicles for the current licensing year.

(2) The Department of Correctional Services shall deliver the license plates each year as directed by the Department of Motor Vehicles through a secure process and system.

Laws 1931, c. 22, § 2, p. 95;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-137;

R.S.1943, § 83-123;

Laws 1951, c. 319, § 2, p. 1091;

Laws 1953, c. 207, § 14, p. 730;

Laws 1959, c. 442, § 3, p. 1486;

Laws 1959, c. 284, § 5, p. 1078;

Laws 1969, c. 497, § 2, p. 2067;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 112, § 46;

Laws 2009, LB49, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 101.